CSO 

<F P=106> [Report entitled "Work Vigorously On Reform, Accelerate </F>
Development: Struggle for Zhejiang's Early Achievement of the 
Second Step of the Strategic Goal--Report of the Ninth Session 
of the Zhejiang Provincial CPC Congress Delivered by Li Zemin 
(2621 3419 3046) on 19 December 1993"] 
  [Text] Dear Comrades: 
  The Ninth Session of the Zhejiang Provincial Party Congress 
is convened under the spiritual guidance of the 14th National 
Party Congress and at the critical time of our accelerating the 
construction of the socialist market economic system. It is 
convened at a time when Zhejiang's reform and opening up and 
economic and social development are achieving important results. 
The main purpose of the congress is to make the theory of 
constructing a socialism with Chinese characteristics our guide, 
learn to act in the spirit of the 14th National Party Congress 
and the Third Plenary Session of the 14th Party Central 
Committee, review and sum up our work since the province's 
Eighth Party Congress, determine the goals of struggle and the 
primary tasks henceforth in our socialist modernization, 
nominate and produce members for the Ninth Zhejiang Provincial 
CPC Committee and the Provincial Discipline Inspection 
Committee, and to mobilize and unify the province's CPC members 
and the masses to accelerate the reform and opening up and the 
modernization process and struggle for Zhejiang's achievement of 
the second step of our strategic goals ahead of schedule. 
  I hereby represent the Eighth Zhejiang Provincial CPC 
Committee in making the report before this congress. 
<H5>  I. Review and Summation of the Last Five Years' Work </H5>
  Since the Eighth Provincial Party Committee, under the Party 
Central Committee' leadership, the province's party 
organizations at all levels and the people and masses have 
diligently implemented the party's basic line, insisted on 
making economic construction the core, upheld the four basic 
principles, and have upheld reform and opening up. In 
particular, encouraged by Comrade Deng Xiaoping's important 
speech during his southern tour and by the spirit of the 14th 
National Party Congress, we have seized the opportunity to 
accelerate development and have propelled Zhejiang's reform and 
construction onto a new phase. In the last five years, we have 
withstood the tests of political storm at home and the turmoils 
in the international scene; we have overcome the hardships 
brought by natural disasters, and we have implemented three 
years of rectifications and improvement. The province is 
politically stable, socially stable, and economically 
well-developed. The last five years have been five years during 
which the masses of cadres and people liberated their thinking, 
sought truth from facts, pursued reform and opening up, and made 
deliberate efforts to forge ahead. It has been five years of 
noticeable increase in economic strength, drastic changes in the 
appearance of town and country, continuous improvement in the 
living standards, and of comprehensive social and economic 
development. It has been five years of gradual strengthening of 
party construction, socialist spiritual civilization, and 
democratic legislation under the new conditions. It has been 
five years of seizing opportunities, of struggling in unity, and 
of continuous progress on the road to building a socialism with 
Chinese characteristics. 
  One, economic development entered a new phase as we 
gained comprehensive economic strength. It is estimated 
that Zhejiang's 1993 GDP will top 164.5 billion yuan (148.3 
billion yuan based on 1990 prices), more than 76 percent higher 
than 1988's, and achieving the goal of quadrupling the GDP seven 
years ahead of schedule. The province's financial revenues is 
expected to be 15 billion yuan, more than 75 percent higher than 
1988's. The gross value of industrial output [GVIO] is estimated 
to be 378 billion yuan, nearly three time 1988's. Technological 
progress clearly played a larger part in the economic growth, 
accounting for approximately 35 percent. Enterprises made good 
progress in updating technological installations, improving 
production techniques, improving management and administration, 
and becoming better organized; we have achieved good overall 
economic efficiency. In the agricultural sector, while 
maintaining basic stability in grain production, the planting, 
forestry, livestock, and fishery industries also underwent 
all-out development. Agriculture using "one superior and two 
high" has taken its first steps. Township enterprises have 
become an important mainstay in Zhejiang's economic development, 
dominating two-thirds of the economy, and they played a very 
important role in subsidizing and developing agriculture, 
exporting to earn foreign exchange, promoting the shift in rural 
labor force, and in building up small cities and towns. The 
counties also gained economic strength. We now have many 
socially and economically well-developed counties and towns. 
Fixed asset investments in the last five years grew another 1.4 
fold over the previous five-year period; key construction 
projects achieved outstanding results. A succession of power 
plants, highways, railways, ports, airports, and communications 
facilities and other mainstay projects have been completed. The 
province's power generating capacity has increased by 2.36 
million kw; super highways have increased by more than 4,000 km; 
coastal port handling capacity has increased by 31.90 million 
tons. Program-controlled telephones were installed in the 
counties and cities, and city and rural telephone exchange 
capacity was increased by 1.14 million units. The province also 
worked on the Lake Tai and Wuqijiang River diversion and other 
major water conservancy projects. The infrastructure has greatly 
improved, which has increased the momentum of economic 
development. 
  Two, reform broadened and deepened; the market has 
become an important means of allocating resources. With 
regard to rural reform, we continued to stabilize and perfect 
the responsibility system, which is made up primarily of 
family-based, output-related contracts, and the two-tier 
management system which integrates centralization and 
decentralization. We were among the first to decontrol grain 
prices and actively promote the shareholding cooperative system. 
The factors of production have never been more active. The rural 
economy has begun to change tracks to the market economy. We 
made implementing the "Provision" and the pilot shareholding 
system our focal point to accelerate the change in management 
mechanisms in the state-owned enterprises and town and country 
collective enterprises. We began with the restructuring of the 
property rights system and worked hard to explore ways to 
achieve the public-ownership system effective. Publicly-owned 
enterprises, especially the large and medium-sized mainstay 
enterprises, gained new vitality, ability to adapt to market 
changes, and ability to compete. We actively encouraged and 
supported the localities to suit measures to local conditions in 
developing individual and privately-owned economies and adjust 
to the rapid and healthy development of non-public-owned 
economies of different local characteristics. Reform practices 
that emphasized the market adopted by Wenzhou and other 
localitie s have had good results and have produced a positive 
impact on the province's reform and economic development. The 
vast majority of commodities and labor services have been 
decontrolled; circulation has been enlivened. Markets for all 
types of commodities have grown rapidly; there are more than 
4,000 fairly large commodity markets. The Yiwu Small Goods 
Market and Shaoxing Light Industrial and Textile Market and 
other specialized wholesale markets with vast national impact 
have sprung up. Fund, technology, talent, labor, and real estate 
markets have begun to emerge, and we have a fledgling market 
system made up of multi-level markets with different management 
styles and made up of diverse economic components. We made 
promoting the integration of science and technology and the 
economy and the nurturing of useful talents our goal as we 
continued to promote the restructuring of the science and 
technology and education systems. A complete set of reforms 
pertaining to the social security, labor employment, and housing 
systems made good progress. Efforts to change the government's 
functions and improve macro regulation and control had a good 
start. 
  Three, opening up to the outside world made 
breakthroughs; the externally oriented economy underwent rapid 
development. We took the opportunity of the readjustment of 
the international industrial structure and the development and 
opening up of Pudong and paid special attention to giving play 
to our human relations and location advantages, and despite the 
relatively flat domestic market, we made use of international 
and domestic markets to supplement each other to develop our 
externally oriented economy. It is estimated that over the last 
five years, the province has signed foreign capital utilization 
contracts worth a total of $8.2 billion, 11.2 times more than 
the sum total of the previous 10 years since reform and opening 
up began. Actual foreign capital utilization came to $2.2 
billion, an increase of 3.4 folds. In 1993, the province's 
foreign export volume came to $4.35 billion, 1.7 times more than 
1988's. At the same time, we actively expanded the scope and 
territory of our opening up. The number of open cities and 
counties has increased to 37, and the number of state-class 
development zones has increased to six. The State Council has 
also approved the comprehensive opening up of the Ningbo 
tax-free zone and Daxie Island to the outside world. The number 
of province-level development zones has increased to 37, and 
many industrial satellite towns have sprung up. These have 
formed a preliminary pattern of opening up where development 
zones, open cities, open regions, and industrial satellite 
towns, foreign trade, foreign capital, and foreign economy are 
all emphasized. 
  Four, people's lives have clearly improved, and we are 
steadily becoming fairly well-off. The urban and rual 
population are earning higher income. It is estimated that in 
1993 the average per-capita regular income for people in cities 
and towns was 3,400 yuan; rural per-capita income topped 1,590 
yuan, and after factoring in the higher prices, they represented 
increases of 42.4 percent and 25.6 percent, respectively, 
compared to 1988. Living conditions further improved. In 1993, 
the per-capita living space for people in cities and towns was 
11.8 sq m, 2.5 sq meter more than in 1988. Sixty-eight percent 
of the people had full housing. The rural population's 
per-capita living space was 32 sq meters, 6 sq meters more than 
in 1988. The consumption mix of people living in both urban and 
rural areas clearly improved, further improving the quality of 
life. 
  Five, spiritual civilization and democratic legislative 
constructions made new progress, which brought comprehensive 
social progress. Scientific and technological undertakings 
underwent rapid development. Over the whole period, significant 
results were obtained in 1,570 scientific and technological 
projects. The scientific research units gained vitality, and the 
number of civilian-run scientific and technological institutions 
has greatly. The development of educational undertakings 
accelerated. Province-wide, 83 percent of the populated areas 
have implemented nine-year compulsory education. We had great 
success at eliminating illiteracy. The structure of secondary 
school education clearly improved. Vocational-technical 
education and adult education developed fairly rapidly; 
full-time enrollment in colleges and universities increased 
significantly, and the quality of education improved somewhat. 
Cultural undertakings flourished; literature and arts, radio and 
TV broadcast, news and publication, theory studies and so on 
produced some very fine results. We built a new radio and TV 
broadcast center, the Zhejiang Museum, the Hemudu Museum, and 
other major cultural facilities. Medical and public health 
conditions improved. Mass sports activities were held, and 
competitive sports reached higher standards. Our family planning 
program remained the most progress in the nation. Activities 
relating to spiritual civilization construction were broadly 
launched in the urban and rural areas. We advocated good social 
tendencies, and the masses were continuously introduced to new 
ideas and concepts. We have gradually freed ourselves from the 
bondage of "leftist" ideology and outdated concepts and have 
become more aware of the ideas of reform and opening up. 
Society's spiritual outlook has changed dramatically. 
  With respect to the construction of the democratic 
legislation system, we supported the People's Congress and its 
standing committee's carrying out their duties according to the 
law to strengthen the legislative process. Over the last five 
years, Zhejiang Province has promulgated and approved 58 local 
laws and provisions and issued 62 administrative regulations; we 
have stepped up law enforcement and supervision. We attached 
importance to united front work. The people's consultative 
conferences at all levels participated in government, discussed 
politics, exercised democratic supervision, and made many 
important proposals and suggestions on major issues pertaining 
to the construction of Zhejiang's two civilizations. We have 
strengthened the comprehensive administration of public security 
and engaged in in-depth struggles to "wipe out pornography," 
"eliminate the six evils," and enforce the "three crackdowns and 
one prohibition." We cracked down hard on serious penal and 
economic crimes, launched universal legal education, and 
enhanced the masses' legal concept, and we have maintained 
social stability. 
  Six, we adjusted to the new situation of reform and 
opening up, and party construction was strengthened and 
improved. We attached importance to the party's ideological 
and theoretical construction and broadly educated the masses of 
party members and cadres on the basic theories of Marxism, the 
party's basic line, and basic knowledge about the party. In 
particular, we arm the whole party with Comrade Deng Xiaoping's 
socialist theories with Chinese characteristics. On the 
important issue of reform and opening up, we clarified what was 
right and wrong, got rid of outdated ideas and concepts, and 
made the masses of party members and cadres more conscious and 
steadfast about going all-out to implement the party's basic 
line. We strengthened the formation of the contingent of cadres 
and trained and promoted many fine young and middle-aged cadres. 
We readjusted and amplified the leading groups at above 
county-level, improved the groups' structure, and diligently 
worked on establishing the leading groups' ideologies and 
working style and on cadre training. Through the process of 
"double promote, double test" and other formats, we openly chose 
party and government leading cadres. We implemented the cadre 
exchange and leave-of-absence and retirement systems and 
actively restructured the cadre system. We worked on the 
construction of grass-roots organizations in a focused and 
systematic way and rectified and changed the backward rural 
party branches and reinforced a whole array of village-level 
organizations that centered around the party branches. We 
improved the overall quality of the enterprise leading groups 
and gave play to the political core role of enterprise party 
organizations. We focused on the new situation and diligently 
summed up our experiences and formulated a program and made 
suggestions on grass-roots rural, enterprise, and office party 
organizations. We strengthened the education, training, and 
management of the masses of party members and recruited party 
members from the production, management, scientific research and 
education frontlines and gave play to the exemplary vanguard 
role of the CPC members in the construction of the two 
civilizations. We diligently worked on our party's working style 
and on building an honest government. The leading cadres took 
the lead in embracing honesty and self-discipline, and we 
prosecuted some cases of internal violation of party discipline 
and expelled some corrupt elements. We stopped the leading 
cadres and staff in party and government organs from such 
unhealthy practices as accepting gift certificates and money or 
using public funds to travel abroad or take trips. We are still 
in the process of sorting out the improper fee collections and 
rectifying the practices of party and government organs doing 
business and running enterprises and so on. In recent days, 
anti-corruption struggles have had tentative success in some 
areas. 
  Zhejiang owes its success over the last five years to the 
proper leadership of the Party Central Committee, the foundation 
laid down by the previous session of the provincial party 
committee, the provincial party organizations at all levels, the 
masses of CPC members, the democratic parties and factions, the 
general public, the troops stationed in Zhejiang, and people of 
all nationalities in the province who struggled in unity. We 
also owe our success to the vigorous support of the fraternal 
provinces and municipalities, our Hong Kong-Macao-Taiwan 
compatriots, and the overseas Chinese as well as to the sincere 
cooperation of our friends from around the world. I hereby 
represent the Zhejiang Provincial Party Committee in expressing 
our heart-felt gratitude and paying our highest respect to 
comrades who have contributed to Zhejiang's reform and 
development and to our friends who have shown concern and 
support for Zhejiang's construction. 
  In reviewing and summing up our work over the last five 
years, the most fundamental point is that we must always 
resolutely uphold the basic theory of developing a socialism 
with Chinese characteristics and the party's basic line, 
liberate our thinking, seek truth from facts, and perform our 
work with creativity. In the last five years, reform and 
development have had many favorable opportunities but have also 
faced some complicated situations. The provincial party 
committee insisted on making economic construction the core and 
made deepening the reform, expanding the scope of opening up, 
and accelerating the pace of development the basic guiding 
ideology for its work, and in the actual course of work, it went 
through a process of summing up its experiences and continuously 
deepening and heightening its understanding. After the 1989 
political storm and in the midst of the changing international 
situation, the provincial party committee followed the Central 
Party Committee's plans to reinforce the people's socialist 
conviction and educate them on the party's basic line, and we 
concentrated our energy on economic construction. During the 
period of rectification and improvement, while the provincial 
party committee carried out the Party Central Committee's macro 
policies and adopted measures to promote economic recovery and 
development, it also acquired a better understanding of the 
province's own situation and established an economic development 
guiding ideology that centered around improving the overall 
quality of the national economy to "lay foundation, set 
standards, and increase efficiency." After Comrade Deng 
Xiaoping's important southern tour speech and the 14th National 
Party Congress, we upheld the criteria of the "three 
beneficial," further liberated our thinking, and smashed the 
"leftist" and old ideological bondages, learned and borrowed 
from the advance experiences of our fraternal provinces and 
municipalities, stepped up the reform and opening up, seized 
opportunities, accelerated development, and proposed the goals 
of striving to form a tentative basic framework of the socialist 
market economic system by the end of the Eighth Five-year Plan 
period and basically create the new economic system's 
functioning mechanisms and operating modes by the end of the 
century. We established a pattern of opening up to the outside 
world whereby we "let the three cities take the lead, accentuate 
what is important, rely on the ports, develop along two lines, 
proceed in steps, and open up in all directions." We made the 
important decisions to reform the grain procurement and 
marketing system, decontrol grain prices, readjust the 
agricultural structure, develop "one superior and two high" in 
agriculture, and guide agriculture and the peasants toward the 
market. We established the strategy of "using science and 
education to vitalize the province" and truly shift economic 
construction onto a new track where we rely on scientific and 
technological progress and improve labor quality. We focused on 
the new situation that have emerged from the rapid economic 
development and followed the Central Party Committee's 
instruction to promptly strengthen regulation and control and 
strived to maintain the economy's sustained, speedy, and healthy 
development. While it concentrated on economic construction, the 
Provincial Party Committee also complied with the general 
principle of "grasping with both hands" and attached increasing 
importance to party construction, spiritual civilization, and 
the democratic legislative system and formulated a preliminary 
line of thinking which, given the condition of developing a 
socialist market economy, consisted pri marily of the 
construction of leading groups, grass-roots organizations, and 
socialist spiritual civilization and an honest government. We 
have formulated a socialist spiritual civilization construction 
program for the entire province. The practices and creations of 
the province's party organizations at all levels and the masses 
were the sources of these important decisions and measures. 
They suited Zhejiang's realistic conditions and have 
effectively promoted Zhejiang's reform and opening up and 
economic and social development. 
  When looking back at the past and looking forward to the 
future, we should soberly realize that there are still many 
problems and conflicts before us, and there will still be many 
mistakes and inadequacies in our work. Zhejiang is a coastal 
province, and based on the Central Party Committee's standards, 
we still fall short in ideologies and understanding, and our 
workstyle still does not measure up. We still lack boldness of 
vision and courage in our reform and opening up; we lack 
pioneering spirit. When we run into problems, we fail to reach 
consensus and are slow to reach unity in thinking. Decisions 
have been made on some matters, but we fail to carry them out 
firmly and decisively. We lack a clear understanding of the new 
situation and new problems that have merged amid the rapid 
economic development and the transition from the old to the new 
systems. In our practical work, the idea that agriculture is the 
nation's foundation is still not firmly established, and our 
ways and means of guiding agriculture and the peasants toward 
the market still need to be improved and made more thorough. We 
still have many problems in speeding up the development of 
science and technology and education; we must still work long 
and hard on it. On the issue of "grasping with both hands," we 
are still tough on the one hand and lenient on the other hand. 
In many ways, our party construction, spiritual civilization, 
and democratic legislative system are still incompatible with 
the new situation. In particular, we still face many problems 
with the party's workstyle, honesty in government, social 
tendencies, and public security and so on. Negative and corrupt 
phenomena are still rampant in some areas, and the masses are 
upset. We must pay close attention to these issues and work hard 
to resolve them to guarantee the success of Zhejiang's reform 
and opening up and modernization. 
<H5>  II. Future Objectives of Struggle and Guiding Ideologies </H5>
  The 14th National Party Congress has drawn up a strategic 
plan for the Changjiang Delta and other coastal regions. 
Zhejiang is situated on the south wing of the Changjiang Delta; 
it has a fairly sound economic base, and we are ready and 
determined to seize the opportunity to accelerate development. 
By the year 2010, Zhejiang's economic and social development's 
major indicators should reach that of a moderately 
well-developed nation today, and we strive to become one of the 
first provinces in China to achieve modernization. 
  The 1990's is a critical period in Zhejiang's modernization. 
By the year 2000, the main objectives of reform and construction 
are: 
  Quadruple the GDP. We want to improve quality, 
optimize the structure, increase efficiency, and increase the 
GDP at an average rate of more than 10 percent a year. Based on 
1990 prices, the GDP should exceed 230 billion yuan, averaging 
more than 5,00 yuan per person, four times that of 1980's. We 
even hope to achieve that goal ahead of schedule. 
  Establish the basic socialist market economic 
operating mechanisms. We should tentatively set up a modern 
enterprise system, allocation system, social security system, 
and a macro management system that meet the needs of the market 
economy and basically complete the change in government 
functions and gradually establish a unified open market system 
so that the market can play a fundamental role in allocating 
resources. 
  Set up a fairly complete externally oriented economic 
system. The economy should become even more externally 
oriented. Foreign export volume should increase at a rate of 16 
percent a year, topping $10 billion and accounting for about 25 
percent of the GDP. Foreign capital utilization should become 
one of the main sources of Zhejiang's construction funds. We 
should expand the bilateral flow of domestic and foreign funds, 
capital, and labor and gradually develop multinational 
operations. We should set up operating modes that link up with 
international regulation s and practices and meet the needs of 
the externally oriented economy. 
  Modernize the economic and social structures. We 
should steadily increase agricultural output, clearly improve 
quality, and speed up the modernization process. The province's 
non-agricultural labor force should account for more than 55 
percent of the total labor force; the service industries should 
account for around 35 percent of the GDP. Industries and 
services should gradually gather in the cities and towns; the 
rate of urbanization should reach more than 35 percent. The 
natural rate of population increase should be kept at below 8 
per thousand. 
  Scientific, technological, and educational undertakings 
should be gradually developed to keep up with the economic and 
social development. By the end of the Eighth Five-Year Plan 
period, Zhejiang's nine-year compulsory education basically 
should become universal and illiteracy among the young people 
and mature basically should be wiped out, and on those bases, 
cities and towns at above county-level basically should be able 
to provide senior high school education as needed and provide a 
larger proportion of junior and senior high school graduates 
with vocational-technical training if they do not want to 
further their formal education. We should increase full-time 
enrollment by 10,000 people in the regular colleges and in adult 
colleges. We should improve the quality of the workers and 
promote scientific and technological progress. For every 10,000 
people, we need 115 scientists and technicians. Technological 
progress should account for 40-50 percent of economic growth. 
  Raise the level of spiritual civilization in the urban 
and rural areas. To meet the needs of developing the 
socialist market economy and promoting comprehensive social 
progress, we must strive to improve the people's ideological and 
moral quality and scientific and cultural quality and nurture 
idealistic, moralistic, cultured, and disciplined socialist 
citizens. We want a relatively sound democratic legislative 
system, a stable and unified society, good moral habits, 
flourishing cultural undertakings, and a nice and clean 
environment. 
  Help the people to become relatively well-off fairly 
soon. While most localities in the province are striving to 
become relatively well-off by the end of the Eighth Five-Year 
Plan period, we should further raised their material living 
standard and amplify their spiritual lives. The poor regions 
should become relatively well-off by the end of the Ninth 
Five-Year Plan period. The per-capita regular cost-of-living 
income of people in the cities and towns and the per capita 
income of people in the rural areas should double that of 1990's 
based on constant prices. 
  In the 1990's, as we move toward modernization, we will face 
profound changes in the international and domestic situations. 
In particular, because of our objective to set up a socialist 
market economic system and go all out to implement reform, we 
will face rare historical opp ortunities as well as grim 
challenges. We must seize the opportunities and face the 
challenges head-on. We have many favorable conditions but also 
many impediments. After more than a decade of reform and 
construction, Zhejiang has acquired strong material and 
technological bases; our agricultural development has reached 
fairly high standards; our industries, especially township 
industries, are fairly large in scale, and our production 
conditions have improved. We will have much potential for 
accelerating our development in the future. Zhejiang's 
commodities markets developed fairly early; our enterprise 
management mechanisms are flexible, and we have developed 
several types of economies at the same time. We have strong 
internal vitality for economic development, which makes it 
easier for us to change over to the new economic system. 
Zhejiang's superior location, ports, and human resources are 
playing an increasingly important role in opening up to the 
outside world, which will facilitate our making even better use 
of the international and domestic resources and markets to 
accelerate development. In particular, what is rare and precious 
is that the masses of party members, cadres, and people have 
displayed tremendous enthusiasm and pioneering and creative 
spirit during reform and opening up, and they have become a 
mighty force behind the socialist modernization construction. At 
the same time, we should also see that Zhejiang's economic 
operating mechanisms are not smooth; its infrastructure has 
serious "bottlenecks"; its factors of production are not put to 
full use. As the main force behind the province's economic 
growth, overall, the processing industry's products are still 
low in technical content; enterprises' technological 
installation standards and organization are poor. Our products 
lack competitiveness; we are still using extensive management 
and quantitative expansion to bring growth. We lack people with 
scientific and technical skills or international trade and 
business and economic management training and experience. Our 
ideologies and concepts, ways of thinking, work methods, and 
management system are incompatible with the development of the 
market economy. These problems will increasing impede the 
formation of the unified open market at home and hinder our 
efforts to link tracks with the international markets. We must 
thoroughly analyze the situation and correctly understand the 
situation before us, rouse our spirits, fill ourselves with 
confidence, and increase our own sense of urgency of the times 
and sense of historic responsibility. 
  In order to achieve Zhejiang's grand reform and development 
objectives, we must follow the theory of constructing a 
socialism with Chinese characteristics, staunchly uphold the 
party's basic lines for a hundred years, start out from 
Zhejiang's own reality, review our work experience over the last 
five years, and put the "five insists" in our work guiding 
ideologies: 
  One, insist on making economic construction the core 
and always make developing the productive forces our basic 
duty. Insisting on development is sound reasoning. 
Ultimately, what is going to solve our problems is economic 
development. We must seize the opportunity, accelerate 
development, and reach a higher plane once every few years. We 
must improve the national economy's overall quality, "lay 
foundation, set standards, and improve efficiency"; we must 
reinforce the three foundations--agriculture, infrastructure, 
and science and technologies and education--vigorously raise the 
technological and management standards, and focus on the 
development of industries and products that have high technical 
content, earn foreign exchange, have high added-value, have 
large market capacity, are low in energy and raw material 
consumptions, and have no adverse environmental impact. We must 
combine speed and efficiency and embark on the road of thorough 
reform, optimal structure, intensive management, and 
externally-oriented development. We must accentuate the 
essential, unify planning with due consideration for all 
concerned, do our utmost, gauge our own capacity, guide action 
according to circumstances, develop our strong points and avoid 
our shortcomings, struggle arduously, unite and move forward to 
achieve sustained, speedy, and healthy economic development, and 
bring more real benefits to the people. 
  Two, insist on using reform to achieve development and 
always make reform the main driving force behind economic and 
social development. The key to accelerated development is 
thorough reform. Only by seizing reform opportunities can we 
seize development opportunities. As economic growth accelerates 
and economic relations become more complicated, we must boldly 
explore and blaze new trails and firmly and resolutely pursue 
in-depth reform. We should meet the needs of developing a 
socialist market economic system and make reform more forceful, 
uphold the guiding principle of making the public-ownership 
system be the primary system while allowing other economic 
components to develop at the same time. We should wrap around 
the five key links--a modern enterprise system, a unified market 
system, a perfect macro regulation and control system that 
emphasizes indirect measures, an income allocation system that 
primarily allocates income according to labor and gives priority 
to efficiency but also takes fairness into consideration, and a 
multi-level social security system. We should actively and 
steadily deal with the relationship among reform and development 
and social stability, achieve major breakthroughs, coordinate 
the entire process, proceed in gradual steps, and go all out 
with reform while maintaining social stability. 
  Three, insist on opening up in all directions and 
always make pushing outward the primary means of accelerating 
development. We should actively take part in international 
division of labor and exchange and make full use of the 
international and domestic markets and resources to promote 
economic development. We should further broaden the scope and 
widen the domain of opening up to the outside world, export 
higher grade goods, raise the standard of foreign capital 
utilization, and escalate our international economic and 
technological cooperation and exchange. We should link tracks 
with the international markets with respect to enterprise 
mechanisms, market standards, and management systems to increase 
our ability to compete internationally. 
  Four, insist on "grasping with both hands" and "firm 
with both hands," and always make giving play to our political 
superiority the fundamental guarantee of our economic and social 
development. To realize the grand objective of socialist 
modernization, we must insist on the party's leadership, 
strengthen party ideology, organization, and workstyle. We must 
adhere to the purpose of serving the people with our hearts and 
minds, carry forward and amplify the party's fine traditions and 
workstyle, and strive to raise our leadership standard in 
modernization. Our spiritual civilization construction must obey 
and serve the central purpose of economic construction and 
provide the strong spiritual drive, intellectual support, 
ideological guarantee, and good public opinion environment for 
developing the socialist market economic system and 
modernization construction. We must abide by the guiding 
principle of emphasizing construction, make doing our best a 
basic principle, insist on mediation and guidance, enhance 
unity, and focus on mobilizing enthusiasm. We must emphasize 
education and the legal system, improve personal quality, 
discipline social conduct, improve social tendencies, and 
preserve social and political stability. We must actively 
explore new ways to strengthen party construction, socialist 
spiritual civilization, and democratic legislation under the 
conditions of the market economy. 
  Five, insist on liberating ideas and seeking truth from 
facts, and always make the "three beneficial" the criterion for 
disguishing right from wrong. With respect to "one core and 
two basic points," we must guard against the right, but mainly 
we must stop the "left." We must continue to smash the "leftist" 
ideological bondages, insist that the basic principle of reform 
and opening up cannot be changed, and that there will be on 
endless debates. We must boldly explore and dare to experiment. 
We must consciously ask ourselves, "Do the people support this 
or not?" "Do the people agree with this or not?" "Are the people 
happy about this or not?" "Are the people satisfied or not?" 
These questions are the starting point and the final destination 
in everything we think, do, and decide. We must insist on 
material dialectics and avoid partial views. We must have a 
scientific attitude, respect objective laws, start out from 
reality, and be creative in our work. We must respect the 
masses' pioneering spirit and guide, protect, and give play to 
the masses' enthusiasm. 
<H5>  III. The Primary Tasks of Reform and Development for the </H5>
Next Five Years 
  The next five years will be five years that determine 
whether 
Zhejiang will achieve its 1990's objectives. It will be the 
critical five years for developing the basic socialist market 
economic operating mechanisms and will also be five years for 
laying the foundation for achieving modernization in the 
beginning of the next century. In these five years, we must work 
hard to accomplish the following eight major tasks: 
  One, move forward with reform and accelerate the 
track-changing to the socialist market economic system. 
  "The CPC Central Party Committee's Decision on Several 
Issues 
Pertaining to the Establishment of the Socialist Market Economic 
System" is the program for action to accelerate reform and 
development. We should heed the Central Party Committee's 
demands, start out from Zhejiang's own conditions, formulate and 
carry out specific programs and measures of implementation, 
accentuate the reform focuses, pay attention to linking them 
with the current reform measures, and lose not time in pushing 
forward with reform. 
  We must make enterprise reform more thorough and concentrate 
efforts on creating a new enterprise system. We should make 
smoothing out property rights relations and changing management 
mechanisms the core in accelerating the development of a modern 
enterprise system that clearly delineates property rights, 
specifies rights and responsibilities, separates government and 
enterprises, and utilizes scientific management. We should 
actively explore proper modes and effective ways of managing and 
administering publicly-owned assets, especially state-owned 
assets. Setting up a modern enterprise system is an arduous and 
complicated task. We must create the conditions and proceed in 
gradual steps. Today, we must continue to implement the 
"Industrial Enterprise Law Under the Ownership by the Whole 
People System" and "Regulations on Changing Operating Mechanisms 
in Industrial Enterprises in the Ownership by the Whole People 
System," hand over a hundred percent of enterprises' rights and 
responsibilities, and accelerate the pace of changing the 
state-owned enterprises' management mechanisms and adjusting 
their organizational structure to further enliven the large and 
medium-sized mainstay enterprises. We must strengthen the 
supervision and management of state-owned enterprises' 
properties, guide the flow of the existing stock and the 
direction of input of the incremental assets and guarantee the 
preservation and appreciation of property value and quality 
improvement. Qualified state-owned enterprises should gradually 
implement the company system. Most small state-owned enterprises 
can turn to contract management or lease management or 
reorganize under the shareholding cooperative system, or they 
can be sold to collectives or individuals. Starting out from the 
fact that Zhejiang has a fairly large proportion of collective 
enterprises, we should pay attention to sorting out the property 
rights relations between township enterprises and the cities' 
and towns' collective enterprises. The emphasis should be on 
vigorously promoting the shareholding cooperative system. 
Through property circulation and reorganization, we should 
develop economic units of mixed ownership systems and create a 
new ownership structure. We can develop some large 
trans-regional, trans-industrial enterprise groups which are 
primarily publicly owned but are linked by the ties in property 
rights. We should make use of such formats as limited liability 
companies, shareholding corporations, wholly state-owned 
enterprises, cooperative management enterprises, and 
shareholding cooperative companies to gradually standardize 
enterprise organization. 
  We must uphold the guiding principle that the 
public-ownership system is the primary system but economies of 
different components may coexist and develop at the same time. 
The role of the public-ownership system in the national economy 
may vary depending on locality and industry. While developing ad 
strengthening the publicly-owned economy, we should continue to 
vigorously develop foreign-funded economy and actively encourage 
the development of individual and private economies. We should 
let families and individuals take over industries and products 
suitable for family-based production and operation. In 
economically underdeveloped regions, we must support the 
development of individual and private economies even more, so 
that they can be important growth points in the local economies. 
We must perfect the pertinent policies and rules and regulations 
and strengthen the guidance and management of individual, 
private, and foreign-funded economies to ensure their healthy 
development. 
  By putting the emphasis on developing producer goods 
markets, 
we can speed up the fostering and development of the market 
system and promote modernized circulation. we should further 
develop the commodity markets, and taking the needs of commodity 
circulation into consideration, we should build a fully-equipped 
commodity market network that integrates large, medium-sized, 
and small markets and accommodates all economic formats and 
operati ng modes. We should actively foster financial, 
technology, information, labor, skilled personnel, and real 
estate markets; we should develop and amplify securities 
exchange institutions, gradually groom capital markets, and 
create the conditions to set up futures markets that are linked 
to the international markets. We should further smooth out price 
relations and set up mechanisms that mainly let the market set 
prices. We should standardize market behavior and smash regional 
and departmental separatism and blockades, oppose unfair 
competition, develop market intermediaries, create an 
environment of fair competition, and form a large unified, open, 
competitive, and orderly market. 
  We must uphold the system which primarily allocates income 
according to work while accommodating other forms of allocation 
and gives expression to the principle of efficiency first but 
also takes fairness into consideration. We should actively 
promote reform of the allocation system, bring in the 
competitive mechanisms, and smash egalitarianism and allow 
reasonable wage differences. We should continue to encourage 
some regions and some peoples to get rich first through honest 
hard work and legal operations. We encourage those who got rich 
first to help the not-yet-rich, so that eventually everybody is 
well-off. Through our allocation policy and tax regulation, we 
can avoid letting a handful of people earn exorbitant income, 
which will cause extreme polarization. We must give play to all 
positive factors and amplify the retirement, unemployment, and 
the medical insurance systems and gradually set up mechanisms 
that create a benign cycle to gather, utilize, and add value to 
the social security fund and develop a multi-level urban and 
rural social security system. 
  We should follow the principle of separation of government 
and enterprises and streamlining, unification, and efficiency 
when promoting the restructuring of party and government organs 
and changing the government's functions. We should reduce the 
number of specialized economic management organs and the 
overly-small departments; reduce staff size; and improve their 
overall coordination, law enforcement and supervision, and 
social management functions. We should follow the Central Party 
Committee's unified plan to carefully formulate a program to 
implement the restructuring of the party and government organs 
and carry it out actively and steadily in steps. Next year, we 
should basically complete the restructuring of organs at the 
province-level and in 11 cities and prefectures and basically 
reform the county-level organs in the following year. We should 
accelerate the restructuring of the personnel system and 
gradually set up a scientific, categorized management system and 
effective incentive mechanisms in the organs and enterprises and 
institutions in accordance with their different characteristics. 
Reforms in these areas must be coordinated with the reforms in 
the organs and the wage system, and we should install the public 
employee system as soon as possible. 
  We must have a firm grasp on the restructuring of the 
taxation, financial, investment, and planning systems and others 
key area. We must seize the reform opportunity and actively find 
ways and means to carry out reforms. We should set up mechanisms 
that coordinate but also act as constraints in economic planning 
and monetary and financial matters. We should increase auditing 
and economic supervision and change the ways and means we 
provide leadership in economic matters. By drawing up central 
plans and putting a handle on the policies, through guidance and 
information and organization and coordination, and by providing 
services and inspection and supervision, the government's direct 
economic management can be changed to indirect management. While 
obeying the Central Party Committee's macro regulation and 
control, we should improve and strengthen our economic 
regulation and control. 
  Two, open up to the outside world in all directions and 
make the economy even more externally oriented. 
  On the basis of Zhejiang's pattern of opening up, we should 
take advantage of the timing of the development and opening up 
of Shanghai's Pudong, seize the initiative, participate 
actively, and while we focus on Ningbo, Wenzhou, the coastal 
open cities, the Hangzhou international tourist city, and the 
open regions, we should further expand the scope and territory 
of our opening up, speed up the development and opening up of 
central and western Zhejiang, the islands, and the ocean. We 
should give play to local superiorities and expand our opening 
up in all directions, at different levels, and through all 
channels; so that Zhejiang can truly become an important wing as 
the Changjiang Delta's economy take flight. 
  We should further widen the scope of foreign capital 
utilization to emphasize both quantity and quality. We should 
move ahead with our primary, secondary, and tertiary industries 
and stress large, medium-sized, and small projects; we should 
also concentrate our efforts on expanding size and raising 
standards. We must keep a reserve of projects and follow the 
state's industrial policy in guiding foreign capital input, 
particularly toward the infrastructure, raw material industries, 
and the "grafting" and transformation of old enterprises; we 
should encourage the opening of technology-intensive and 
export-oriented enterprises. We must actively utilize foreign 
capital to develop developmental agriculture and agriculture 
that earns foreign exchange. We must continue to improve the 
investment environment, utilize foreign capital in different 
ways, and in particular, pay attention to attracting even more 
investments from large enterprises and financial groups. We 
should recruit more foreign businesses and increase the ratio of 
actual foreign investment. We must strengthen management and 
give more play to the leading--dragon head--roles of the 
tax-free zones, economic and technological development zones, 
and the high and new-tech industry development zone and to the 
role as "windows" to the outside world of the "three kinds of 
wholly or partially foreign-owned" enterprises. 
  We must uphold the reform direction of unified policy, 
decontrolled management, fair competition, integration of 
industry and commerce, and promotion of the agency system and 
fully mobilize the enthusiasm of the foreign trade companies at 
all levels, the non-state-operated export enterprises, and the 
"three kinds of wholly or partially foreign-owned" enterprises. 
We must use quality to gain business and further expand our 
foreign exports. We must optimize the mix of export commodities, 
raise the proportion of export of high added-value commodities 
and commodities that earn more foreign exchange, and open up 
markets in different ways. We should accelerate the foreign 
trade enterprises' change in management mechanisms and encourage 
them to become more industrialized, group-oriented, and 
internationalized to gradually become trans-national operations. 
We should actively develop transportation, warehousing, and 
information and consultation and other service trades associated 
with the import and export trades and continue to expand our 
foreign economic cooperation and exchange, develop foreign 
contracted engineering projects, increase labor exports, and 
create the conditions for setting up enterprises outside of this 
province. We should actively develop trade and economic and 
technological exchange with Taiwan. 
  We should adjust to the development of the externally 
oriented economy and accelerate the construction of the 
enterprise management system, the economic operating modes, the 
social services system, and foreign-related policies and laws 
and regulations and so on. We must abide by international 
regulations and conventions and link tracks with international 
markets. We must step up training of personnel who handle 
foreign matter and promptly develop a mainstay contingent that 
is familiar with international trade, financial businesses, and 
international laws and regulations. 
  Three, actively utilize market mechanisms to allocate 
resources and give impetus to a proper and modern industrial 
structure. 
  Reinforcing agriculture's fundamental role is the 
primary task when adjusting the industrial structure. We 
should make developing agricultural output, vitalizing the 
agricultural products market, and increasing the peasants' 
income our goal. We must plant our foothold on deepening the 
reform, speed up the development of rural economic operating 
mechanisms and management system that meet the needs of the 
socialist market economy, and promote the modernization of 
agriculture to bring economic prosperity to the rural areas. 
One, we must work hard to strengthen leadership in agricultural 
and rural works. Party committees and governments at all levels 
must firmly establish the concept that agricultural is the 
nation's foundation and must never slacken its leadership in the 
agricultural and rural tasks. The party and government must 
personally take hold of agriculture, make sure that the party's 
rural policies are being implemented, organize the departments 
to serve agriculture and the peasants, and strengthen the 
comprehensive agricultural and rural work departments. We must 
nurture and stabilize a contingent of cadres who know 
agriculture, the peasants, and rural tasks well. Two, we must 
deepen rural reform. The responsibility system, which is 
dominated by the family-based output-related contract system, 
and the two-tier management system which integrates 
centralization and decentralization must become the basic 
economic systems for the rural areas; they must be stabilized 
and constantly improved. While upholding the system of 
collective land ownership, we should extend the farmland 
contract periods and permit the inheritance of contract 
management rights in development-oriented production projects 
and allow the legal transfer of land-use rights with 
compensation. While vigorously promoting the shareholding 
cooperative system in township enterprises, we should also bring 
the system to the planting, forestry, livestock, aquatic 
products and developmental agricultural industries and other 
sectors. Three, we should strengthen macro guidance according to 
market conditions and develop "one superior and two high" 
agriculture to stabilize grain production and improve grain 
quality and optimize the mix of crops. We should vigorously 
develop non-grain foodstuff and develop developmental 
agriculture and agriculture that earns foreign exchange. We 
should increase effective supply and raise agriculture's 
economic efficiency and follow the law to protect farmland and 
stabilize the multiple crop indices. We must strictly prohibit 
the abandonment of farmland, and we must increase the land 
productivity rate. Four, we should comply with the profit 
principle and the internal production relations to promote the 
agricultural product purchase and marketing contract system and 
develop production bases and lead enterprises. We should set up 
a service network made up of rural collective econo mic 
organizations, state economic and technological departments, and 
peasant associations. We should develop different forms of 
management that integrate commerce, industry, and agriculture 
and set up and perfect different types of rural markets and 
encourage the peasants to get into the circulation sector. We 
should create a good social environment to link the thousands 
and hundreds of thousands of small producers with the 
ever-changing large markets and raise the level of socialized 
agricultural services and the level of organization as we orient 
the peasants toward the market. Five, we should actively and 
steadily promote proper scale economy in agriculture and 
increase the intensity in farming. We should develop more rural 
production and management entities that meet the needs of the 
socialist market economic development and smash community 
barriers, so that all types of factors of production can 
circulate properly within a wider area and optimize their 
recombination. We should increase labor productivity and attain 
economies of scale to gain new production superiority. Six, in 
the market economy, we should continue to attach importance to 
the government's vigorous protection and society's concern and 
support for agriculture. We should gradually sort out grain and 
other major agricultural product prices, amplify the reserve 
regulation system and market hazard fund, implement the 
protection price procurement system, and perfect the circulation 
system to protect the peasants' interests. According to the 
Central Party Committee, the financial ministry's annual 
agricultural input should increase faster than the increase in 
its regular revenues and agricultural loans should increase 
faster than the average rate of increase in other loans, and 
therefore we should continue to increase agricultural and 
agriculture-related input. We should actively encourage the 
peasants and collectives to increase labor and fund input, 
increase basic farm construction, build and repair water 
conservancy projects, engage in afforestation and the greening 
of the environment, conserve soil and water, continuously 
improve agricultural production conditions, and strengthen the 
agricultural material and technological bases. 
  Strengthening infrastructure construction and 
optimizing the industry mix are the keys to the readjustment of 
the industrial structure. The emphasis of infrastructure 
construction should be on transportation, communications, power, 
and water conservancy projects. Under the state's unified 
planning, we should give full play to the superiority of the 
Beilun deep-water port and accelerate coastal port 
constructions, with the emphasis on Ningbo and Zhoushan and also 
include Wenzhou, Taizhou, and Zhapu, to gradually transform the 
inland river channels and form a colony of ports that accentuate 
the important, share in proper division of labor, supplement 
each other's advantages, and are fully equipped. We should focus 
on airport construction, with special emphasis on the Hangzhou 
International Airport, and form a colony of large, medium-sized, 
and small airports. We should speed up the construction of the 
Shanghai-Hangzhou-Ningbo, Ningbo-Taizhou-Wenzhou, 
Hangzhou-Jinhua-Quzhou, and the Hangzhou-Nanjing (the segment 
within Zhejiang) freeways; the Jinhua-Wenzhou and the 
Zhejiang-Jiangxi railways and the Xiaoshan-Ningbo multiple rail 
tracks; we should also actively study the feasibility of 
constructing local railways in Jinhua, Ningbo, and Taizhou, and 
do a good job with planning and constructi on, so as to 
gradually form a complete road-to-port land transportation 
network. We should expand the land-water-air trunklines' 
transport capacity and gradually set up a broad communications 
avenue that spans the whole province and links with other 
provinces. We must do a good job with the construction of 
communications facilities and create a quality, efficient 
digital communications network throughout the province. We 
should strengthen power planning and development and accelerate 
the construction of coastal power plants, Tianhuangping water 
pumping and storage plants, and electric wire netting in Beilun, 
Jiaxing, Wenzhou, Taizhou, and Qinshan, and gradually ease and 
improve the province's power supply situation. We should draw up 
a plan for harnessing the major rivers and lakes and key 
flood-prone areas, tackle the major water conservancy and city 
water supply projects, increase our flood-prevention and 
draught-resistant capabilities, and improve industrial and 
residential water supply situation. We should pay more attention 
to municipal projects and public utility projects, strengthen 
geological exploration and develop and utilize our mineral 
resources properly. 
  The focal point of the readjustment of the industrial 
structure is the processing industry. We should target both 
domestic and foreign markets, make efficiency our core, utilize 
high and new technologies to transform traditional industries, 
and accelerate the pace of readjusting the product-mix. We 
should make vigorously increasing the products' technological 
content the main direction of assault and upgrade our 
technological equipment, production techniques, and enterprise 
organization to create some superior specialty products that are 
high in quality and grade, that have high added-value, that have 
attained economies of scale, and are very competitive. We should 
strengthen and elevate our mainstay industries and give more 
play to the superiority of our machinery and electrical, 
textile, foodstuff, chemical, building materials, construction 
and other mainstay industries. We should foster lead industries 
and focus on the electronic information industry, with the main 
emphasis on telecommunications equipment and computers; the 
machinery industry, led by communications and transportation 
equipment and engineering machinery; the chemical industry, led 
by new synthetic materials and fine chemical industry. They 
should gradually become the basis of our new industrial 
superiority. We should make use of Ningbo and other coastal 
ports as well as the existing large mainstay enterprises to 
actively develop basic raw materials industries and give impetus 
to the development of the processing industry in the hinterland. 
To speed up the restructuring, we should let ourselves be guided 
by the overall plan and give even more play to the role of 
market mechanisms. For the processing industry, regardless of 
whether it is state-owned industry, city and town collective, or 
township industry, the basic approach to restructuring is to 
establish enterprises as the main investment entities, establish 
the superior and eliminate the inferior amid market competition, 
promote the proper circulation of factors of production, and let 
urban and rural industries support and supplement one another. 
For infrastructure and basic industries that need government 
support, we must make comprehensive planning, link the state and 
the localities, and undertake construction projects on a joint 
basis. We not only must give play to the government's 
coordinating role as the main investment entity but also bring 
in market mechanisms and widen the investment fund gathering 
avenues. Qualified capital construction projects can set up 
shareholding companies to be in charge of fund gathering, 
project construction, and post-construction operations to 
industrialize the infrastructure and increase investment 
efficiency. 
  Accelerating the development of the tertiary industry 
is an important link in promoting proper industrial 
structure. Combining the characteristics of Zhejiang's 
industrial structure and development trend, we should emphasize 
the development of commercial, financial, insurance, tourist, 
and real estate industries which have large potential markets, 
great impetus, and high added-value. We should accelerate the 
development of information, technologies, law, accounting, 
auditing, assessment, consultation, and other intellectual 
services and export-oriented services. In particular, we must 
give play to Zhejiang's rich tourist resources and vigorously 
improve tourist facilities and expand the tourist network, 
improve service quality and further expand international and 
domestic tourism. We must make modernization, socialization, and 
industrialization our direction as we broadly mobilize all 
forces in society. We should make use of state, collective, 
individual, and foreign capital and make central plans, 
accentuate the important, bring in the competitive mechanisms, 
and develop the tertiary industry with speed and efficiency. 
  Four, we should implement the strategy of using science 
and education to vitalize the province and promote economic 
development and social progress. 
  Science and technology should be used in the main 
battleground of economic construction. We should put the 
emphasis on strengthening research, development, and application 
of new technologies and speed up the development of new- and 
high-tech and other industries and set up basic research. We 
should continue to carry out the "Spark," "Bumper Harvest," 
"Blazing Prairie," and "Torch" programs and "Golden Bridge" 
project. We should combine agriculture, science, and education 
and use the development and propagation of fine crop varieties 
as the breakthrough point to strengthen the comprehensive 
development and application and service capability of 
agricultural science and technologies. We should vigorously 
bring in foreign technologies and combine foreign technologies 
with our own and use new technologies, especially electronic 
technologies, to transform traditional industries. We should 
apply the principle of limiting our objective, accentuating the 
important, and giving play to our superiority to focus on 
electronic information, new materials, new energy, bio-tech, and 
integrated electronic machinery and other areas to create some 
high and new tech enterprises. We should set up new and 
high-tech industrial development zones and promote the 
commercialization and industrialization of new- and high-tech 
results. 
  We should set up a new system that is compatible with and 
promotes the development of the socialist market economy that 
complies with science and technology's own laws of development 
and closely links science and technology to the economy. We 
should abide by the guiding principle of "stabilizing one end at 
a time and opening up one parcel at a time" and strengthen basic 
and high-tech research and decontrol the research, development, 
and management activities of the technological development and 
scientific and technology service institutions. We should 
encourage the scientific and technological institutions and 
colleges and enterprises to work together on technological 
development. We should set up technology advancement mechanisms 
in enterprises to integrate the market, scientific research, and 
production, so that they become the main technology development 
entities. We should strengthen the intermediary links that turn 
science and technology into productive forces and vigorously 
develop a market for technologies and improve management, 
supervision, and service system. We should actively develop 
scientific and technological enterprises with different kinds of 
ownership formats and management methods. 
  We should put education in a strategic place to be given 
development priority and diligently implement the "The National 
Education Reform and Development Program." We should vigorously 
strengthen basic education and actively develop vocational 
education, adult education, and higher education and also 
encourage people to learn on their own, use different channels 
to nurture many skilled workers and professionals, and gradually 
develop an education system that meets the needs of economic and 
social development, so that we are ready to face the 21st 
century. Schools at all levels and of all types must abide by 
our educational guiding principles to improve the quality of 
education. We must work hard to set up some senior high schools, 
polytechnic schools, and vocational-technical schools that have 
scale efficiency, provide quality education, and are exemplary. 
We should speed up the reform of the education system and set up 
education investment mechanisms with the state's financial 
allocation playing the major role but also contain other 
fund-raising channels to create a new system where the 
government plays the main part but society also has a role in 
running the schools. We should expand the institutions of higher 
education's rights to make their own decisions, and we should 
work hard to make the schools even better, so that their size 
and structure are more reasonable and their quality and 
efficiency are improved, and we should strive to put some 
colleges in the state's "211 Project" and raise the province's 
overall educational standard and strength. 
  We must respect knowledge and talent, acquire a stronger 
sense of science and technology and education, and diligently 
implement the Party's policy toward intellectuals and the 
"Scientific and Technological Advancement Act," the "Teachers' 
Act," and other laws and rules and regulations. We should take 
effective measures to improve the intellectuals' work, study, 
and living conditions and stabilize and strengthen the science 
and technology and education contingent. We should further 
create the environment and conditions to make the most of every 
individual and to produce as many as talented people as 
possible. We should gradually install an open recruitment 
system, encourage fair competition, and promote proper 
circulation of talented people. We should warmly welcome 
personnel who study abroad to show their concern and support and 
to participate in Zhejiang's modernization and make proper 
arrangements for those who have returned and formulate policies 
to make it free and convenient for people to come and go. We 
should increase input in science and technology and education. 
Input in science and technology which accounts for around 1 
percent of the GDP today should be increased to more than 2 
percent; input in education should be increased from around 2 
percent of the GDP today to around 4 percent. 
  Five, we should give play to local superiorities and 
promote coordinated regional economic development. 
  Based on regional economic and geographic characteristics 
and 
conditions and using the core cities and transportation 
trunklines, we should gradually develop economic districts of 
different characters. We should follow the State Council's 
Changjiang Delta and Changjiang river bank regional economic 
plan, put the emphasis along the Shanghai-Hangzhou-Ningbo 
Highway, make plans to develop them first and further expand the 
pattern of opening up. We must give full play to Hangzhou's 
economic, scientific and technological, and cultural superiority 
and increase its influence as provincial capital city. We should 
accelerate the construction of transportation and shipping lines 
from Beilun to the interior, making it one of the major ports 
that brings the Changjiang Delta to the international markets. 
We should further develop and utilize Ningbo and the Zhoushan 
deep-water maritime space to gradually form a large 
international entrepot and turn Ningbo into a major commercial 
port and heavy and chemical industries base in East China. We 
should give full play to the Hangzhou, Jiaxing, Huzhou, 
Shaoxing, Ningbo, and Zhoushan prefectures' existing economic 
superiority and rely on the core cities and take advantage of 
their locale, which link northern Zhejiang to Pudong, and make 
an earnest effort to strengthen the technological transformation 
of traditional industries and old enterprises and develop rising 
industries to gradually form an economic belt that is even more 
externally oriented and technologically advanced. For Wenzhou 
and Taizhou and other coastal areas, we should actively give 
play to Wenzhou's role as an open city and speed up Taizhou's 
core city construction. We should take advantage of their 
existing fairly flexible enterprise mechanisms and their ability 
to respond quickly to market changes, develop the industrial 
space along the coast and the highway, work hard to upgrade 
industries quickly to form a superior industrial zone that face 
the domestic and foreign markets and emphasize "light, small, 
and fine" industries as a characteristic. For the region along 
the Zhejiang-Jiangxi railway and Jinhua-Wenzhou railway, we 
should give full play to transportation's ability to bring 
things together and give impetus to the economy and develop the 
relatively rich local natural resources and further develop the 
processing industry, developm ental agriculture, and the service 
industry. We should actively open up the border economy and 
strengthen Zhejiang's impact as the great western door. We 
should strengthen the central city construction of Jinhua, 
Quzhou, and Lishui prefectures and give play to their 
superiorities and speed up development to gradually form an 
economic corridor that goes through the three prefectures all 
the way to the coast. 
  While strengthening core city construction and raising the 
level of urbanization, we should seize two focal points and 
accelerate county economic development. One, we must vigorously 
develop township enterprises and make them much more advanced. 
Township enterprises play an important role in the county 
economy, and they must change their operating mechanisms and 
adopt a new property rights system and management methods to 
further increase their vitality. We must accelerate their 
technological transformation, promote technological progress, 
and give play to the exemplary role of Shaoxing's small light 
and textile and machinery and electronics 
Spark-technology-intensive zones and promote high quality 
products and higher management standard and economic efficiency. 
Through the circulation and recombination of factors of 
production, we should develop a group of large and medium-sized 
and externally oriented mainstay enterprises and optimize the 
enterprise organizational structure to create an even better 
enterprise setup. For Zhejiang's southwestern region and the 
minority nationality regions, we must adopt even more versatile 
policies and give them active support and accelerate the 
development of township enterprises. Two, we must accelerate 
rural town and township construction, strengthen the planning 
and management of township construction, and promote the 
gathering of factors of production in the small towns and 
townships. We must focus our energy on turning the county towns 
into small cities; a handful of the qualified towns should be 
turned into mid-sized cities. We should support and develop some 
larger towns and townships at different levels and expand their 
jurisdiction and give full play to their role as links and to 
their ability to impact others. The development of rural market 
town should be linked to the development of small industrial 
zones and markets. Every industry's own characteristics, the 
flow of commodities, and human tradition should be taken into 
consideration, and the existing market towns as backdrop, we 
should design a proper pattern and form a net work. Construction 
of town and township infrastructure should rely mainly on the 
strength of the masses of peasants; we should let the "peasants 
build peasant towns and townships." 
  We should gradually reform the household registration system 
in the small cities and towns and attract peasants to the cities 
and towns to work in industries or do business, speed up the 
transfer of surplus rural labor, gather the agricultural product 
processing industry and other township enterprises in the small 
cities and towns, and give impetus to the development of the 
service industries in the rural areas. 
  We should speed up island and maritime development and 
gradually grow a large maritime economy in the province. We 
should cultivate a stronger sense of the maritime territory, 
maritime economy, and maritime environment. We should insist on 
using opening up to promote development and make unified plans 
and implement them in steps. We should take advantage of our 
location and our resources and let ports, fishery, industry, 
trade, and tourism promote one another while focusing on the 
development of ocean shipping industry, ocean aquatic industry, 
ocean-front industry, island tourism, and domestic and foreign 
trade. At the same time, we should emphasize and actively 
support the rising maritime industry, especially the development 
of new and high-tech maritime industry, and get organized to 
develop our superiority in maritime industry. We should boldly 
utilize foreign and domestic funds, set aside entire islands for 
development, increase input in maritime development and island 
infrastructure through various channels and at different levels 
to gradually set up some lively and vigorous island and maritime 
development operating mechanisms. 
  We should strengthen construction in the mountain areas and 
open up wider both to the inside and outside. We should further 
loosen our policies and increase input through more channels, 
and starting with improving the production and living 
conditions, we can plan some infrastructure projects and give 
the area special support and consideration in terms of 
technology and human and financial resources. Constructions in 
the mountain areas must be based on self-reliance. We must 
endure hardship, suit measures to local conditions, and give 
play to local superior factors to enhance their developmental 
capability. We should bring in funds, technologies, talents from 
the big cities, large enterprises, colleges and universities, 
and science and research institutions. We should emphasize 
development along the highway and along the river and give play 
to the ability of small market towns to bring along the economy; 
develop developmental agriculture, processing industry, and 
service industries; and raise the comprehensive economic 
development standards. 
  We must step up our poverty-relief efforts and strive to 
solve the basic food and shelter problems of people in the 
poverty-stricken regions, the old liberated areas, and the 
reservations quickly and steadily, so that they can become 
relatively well-off by the end of the century. Zhejiang's poor 
regions are mostly in the mountain areas, and besides carrying 
out the state's policies toward the mountain area, we must 
continue to practice a series of proven-effective poverty-relief 
methods by linking departments and localities, through science 
and technologies, through funding, and through regular contacts 
with leading cadres. We must meet the needs of the development 
of socialist market economy, further broaden our thinking, and 
take even more effective measures and get organized as we make 
our assault. One, while we continue to do a better 
poverty-relief job, we should encourage people to go elsewhere 
and leave the mountains, utilize the developed region's economic 
and social advantages to organize labor export, and gather the 
factors of production in the developed regions to open 
industrial and commercial enterprises. Two, through policy 
guidance, we can seize the opportunity as the economically 
better-developed coastal regions are upgrading their industries 
to shift labor-intensive industries and products to the 
poverty-stricken areas. Three, while fully respecting the 
masses' wishes and making sure that they have steady income, we 
should gradually move some of the poor villages and poor 
households from the high mountain areas that have no chance of 
developing to areas along the highway and the river and to the 
river basin and the market towns to develop production and 
escape poverty. Four, we should perfect the poverty-relief fund 
input mechanisms, utilize the poverty-relief funds centrally, 
increase fund-use efficiency, and make an effort to increase our 
ability to "make new blood." 
  Six, we should promote socialist democracy and 
legislation, maintain an orderly economic environment, and 
protect social and economic stability. 
  We should further improve the people's congress system and 
strengthen the legislative and supervisory functions of the 
people's congress and its standing committee. In accordance 
with the Constitution and the party constitution, we should 
acquire a better understanding on upholding and perfecting the 
basic political system of the people's congress, make sure that 
the people's congress and its standing committee can carry out 
their duties according to the law, diligently protect the 
people's right to oversee the state's and society's affairs, and 
give even more play to the role of the people's representatives. 
We should strengthen leadership in legislative work and pay 
attention to the legislative program and standardize the 
legislative process to meet the needs of the socialist market 
economic development and strengthen the legislative system's 
ability to guide, discipline, protect, and restrain. In heeding 
the Party Central Committee, giving expression to the reform 
spirit, and making promoting the development of the productive 
forces our objective, we should take Zhejiang's realistic 
situation into consideration and focus on laws and regulations 
to standardize the market entities' behavior, preserve market 
order, strengthen regulation and control and management, improve 
public security, and promote the opening up to the outside 
world. At the same time, we must attach importance to 
legislations pertaining to the construction of the spiritual 
civilization and honest government, protection of the citizens' 
rights, and preservation of public security; we must handle 
everything according to the law. We must launch universal legal 
education in a planned and systematic way at different levels 
and aiming at different targets. We should make it a point to 
disseminate basic legal knowledge about the market economy and 
diligently increase the masses of cadres' and the public's legal 
knowledge and legal consciousness. Party organizations at all 
levels and CPC members should set the example and implement the 
constitution and the law and insist on doing everything 
according to the law. 
  We should reinforce and develop a patriotic united front for 
the new era, perfect the system of multi-party cooperation and 
political consultation under the CPC's leadership, and give full 
play to the people's consultative conference in political 
consultation and democratic supervision roles. We must uphold 
the guiding principle of "permanent coexistence, mutual 
supervision, utter devotion, and sharing of honors and disgrace" 
and increase consultation and discussion with the democratic 
parties and factions and select and arrange for members of 
democratic parties and non-party-affiliated personages to serve 
in leading positions in state organs and work with them. We 
should further reinforce the coalition of the entire body of 
socialist workers, patriots who support socialism, and patriots 
who support the unification of the fatherland. We should educate 
the masses of party members, especially the leading cadres at 
all levels, on united front theory and general and specific 
policies in the new era and create good conditions for the 
democratic parties and factions and mass organizations and 
patriotic personages to participate in government and discuss 
politics. We should seriously implement the party's policy 
toward religion and strengthen the administration of religious 
matters in accordance with the law and actively provide guidance 
to make religion compatible with socialism. We should fully 
implement the party's policies toward the nationalities, 
overseas Chinese, and Taiwan and do good overseas united front 
work. We should mobilize all positive factors to help Zhejiang 
Province accelerate its reform and opening up and economic 
construction. 
  We should set up a scientific, democratic decision-making 
procedure and system and amplify democracy; open up more avenues 
for free speech; listen to the ordinary people expressing their 
opinions, criticisms, and suggestions about the party and the 
government; and increase the masses' participation in 
government. When making decisions on major policy measures and 
construction projects affecting the province's economy, we must 
first solicit suggestions from society, including all kinds of 
experts and research and consultation organizations, and 
carefully conduct feasibility studies and scientific debates. We 
must strengthen grass-roots democratic construction and 
diligently give play to the roles of the workers' representative 
assembly, the residents committee, and the villagers committee. 
  We should uphold the people's democratic dictatorship, 
strictly apply the Constitution and the law, protect social and 
political stability, and do a good job with the comprehensive 
administration of public security. We should reinforce law 
enforcement and judicial work, protect the people's courts' and 
procuratorates' independence in carrying out their duties 
according to the law, and legally protect the people's right and 
preserve social order and punish all sorts of criminal elements, 
so as to serve reform and opening up and the economic 
construction. Party committees and governments at all levels 
must set up a comprehensive public security leadership 
responsibility system to strengthen leadership in public 
security work. We must uphold the guiding principle of 
integrating the specialized work under the party committee's 
leadership and the mass line, emphasize crackdown and 
prevention, deal with the symptoms as well as the causes, 
strengthen comprehensive administration of public 
security--putting the emphasis at the grass-roots level, and 
practice comprehensive administration and 
management-by-objective. We should properly handle the people's 
internal contradiction and pay close attention to the serious 
problems that can jeopardize social stability during reform and 
opening up. We should comply with the laws and policies in 
regulating various economic and social relations, take the 
initiative to do a good job, attach importance to the masses' 
letters and visits, nip all problems in the bud, and solve all 
problems at the grass-roots level. We should focus on serious 
public security problems and promptly organize efforts to 
struggle against specific and key problems. We should impose 
severe punishment on criminal elements committing serious penal 
and economic crimes and wipe out society's many ugly and evil 
phenomena. We should attach importance to national security work 
and set up a people's defense line to preserve national security 
and crack down on activities of subversion and sabotage 
instigated by hostile forces at home and abroad. We should 
strengthen the political and legal departments' own construction 
and improve the quality of the cadres and police and the 
standards of law enforcement. We should launch national defense 
education to strengthen the people's national defense concept. 
We should uphold the principle that the Party is in charge of 
the military, strengthen militia reserve duty, and do a good job 
with the people's armed forces and air defense. We should 
support the army and give preferential treatment to families of 
revolutionary soldiers and martyrs and show concern and support 
for the troops stationed in Zhejiang. 
  Seven, uphold the guiding principle of emphasizing 
construction and put socialist spiritual construction onto a 
higher plane. 
  We must wrap tightly around the core of economic 
construction, adapt to the new situation and new tasks, and 
strengthen and improve spiritual civilization. We must 
diligently implement the "Zhejiang Socialist Spiritual 
Civilization Construction Program (1993-2000)," focus on the new 
situation and new issues, promptly study policy measures, 
continuously make new demands at every stage, emphasize 
implementation, strive for periodic results, and maintain the 
coordinated development of the two civilizations. 
  We should make improving human quality the core while 
strengthening ideological and moral constructions. We should 
insist on using Marxism and Mao Zedong thoughts and especially 
Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory on constructing a socialism with 
Chinese characteristics to guide the people's thoughts and 
action. We must further liberate our thinking and smash the 
"leftist" and old ideological bondage, reinforce the idea of 
reform and opening up, and establish new ideas and new concepts 
that are compatible with the socialist market economy. We should 
encourage the theoreticians to go deep into society's real 
situation and focus on the major theories and practical issues 
pertaining to the construction of a socialism with Chinese 
characteristics, utilize Marxist stand, viewpoint, and method to 
launch their studies with creativity, strengthen their theories, 
and let philosophy and the social sciences flourish. We should 
vigorously disseminate Marxism and continue to educate the 
masses on patriotism, collectivism, and socialist education. We 
should go deep with our propaganda and amplify the new era's 
pioneering spirit advocated by Comrade Jiang Zemin and be ready 
to make contributions and to struggle arduously. We should 
increase the nationalities' self-respect, self-confidence, and 
self-reliance; uphold a correct outlook on life and value and 
advocate civilized and healthy lifestyle; resist the corrosion 
of capitalism and corrupt feudal ideologies; take a clear stand 
against money worship, extreme individualism, and corrupt 
lifestyles. We must get a firm grip on professional ethics and 
social moral education and advocate unity and mutual aid and 
respect for the old and love for the young. We must boldly stand 
up for what is right and get rid of outdated conventions and bad 
customs, transform social customs, propagate atheism and oppose 
feudal superstition, and foster good social customs. We must 
attach great importance to educating young people on our 
revolutionary tradition, ideologies and character, and the legal 
system. The schools, families, and society should work closely 
together to nurture a new generation of people who have 
ideologies, morality, culture, and discipline. We should improve 
the content and method of conducting ideological and political 
work and find even more effective ways and means and channels to 
filter through and mix ideological and political education int o 
different aspects of reform and opening up and economic 
construction and fully mobilize people's enthusiasm. 
  We should broadly launch spiritual civilization construction 
activities and increase the masses' participation rate. Our 
spiritual civilization must give expression to the spirit of 
doing concrete work and getting concrete results. They should be 
in forms that the masses enjoy and appreciate and are tightly 
linked with and are crucial to the masses' work and life. We 
should continue to widely hold civilized-city-founding 
competition and sponsor activities to create civilized cities 
and towns, civilized units, and civilized small zones; hold 
activities to encourage "five-good" families and to unite the 
army with the people and the police with the people. We should 
actively make the communities, villages and townships, 
enterprises, and campuses more civilized and give civilization 
new substance under the new situation and bring spiritual 
civilization to the grass-roots in town and country. Spiritual 
civilization construction is every department's and everybody's 
business, and we must give full play to the positive roles of 
the party, government, and military committees; the workers, 
youth, and women's committees; old people's committees, other 
working committees, and urban and rural enterprises and 
institutions concerned about the next generation in the 
construction of spiritual civilization. 
  We should uphold the direction of "serving the people and 
serving socialism" and the guiding principle of "letting a 
hundred flowers blossom and a hundred schools of thought 
contend" to help socialist cultural undertakings flourish. We 
should give full play to Zhejiang's cultural superiority, 
continue to amplify the nationalities' fine cultural traditions, 
absorb the fine results of world culture, and strive to create 
even more and even better spiritual products that reflect the 
rhythm of the times, and at the same time, we should pay 
attention to diversity to satisfy the masses' different, 
multi-level, healthy, and progressive spiritual needs. We should 
develop literature, arts, news, publication, broadcast, movies 
and television and other cultural undertakings and correctly 
handle the relationship between social benefits and economic 
benefits while putting social benefits first. We should attach 
importance to propaganda and public opinion, uphold the 
principle of party spirit, firmly establish the mass viewpoint, 
integrate the party's responsibilities with the people's 
responsibilities, and correctly ascertain the direction of 
public opinion. We should mainly use positive propaganda; make 
unity, stability, and agitation the theme; and give full play to 
the functions of propaganda, unity, education, and incentive 
among the masses. We should set up and improve all types of laws 
and regulations and systems and strengthen the administration of 
the cultural market and clean up spiritual garbage and negative 
and corrupt phenomena. 
  We should attach importance to input into spiritual 
civilization construction and guarantee yearly increases. The 
construction of the spiritual civilization's "hardware" should 
be included in the nation's economic and social development 
plans. We should formulate and implement cultural and economic 
policies to widely attract funds, including winning civilian 
support and attracting foreign capital, to gradually form a 
multi-level, multi-formatted spiritual civilization construction 
pattern where the state, enterprises, institutions, and 
individuals all play a part. 
  Eight, we should attach importance to population 
control and environmental protection and improve the quality of 
life. 
  In addition to developing the economy, we must continuously 
improve living conditions in the cities and the countryside. We 
must open up the production sectors and increase employment 
opportunities. We should gradually set up a wage system and a 
normal wage increase mechanism that is consistent with the 
characteristics of respective enterprises and institutions and 
various organs to increase the workers' actual income. We should 
strengthen commodity price management and keep the price level 
under control to protect the consumers' interests. We should do 
a good job with the market basket project and make a vigorous 
effort to build urban nonstaple foodstuff and vegetable 
production bases and improve the supply situation. We must show 
concern for the low-income workers and do a good disaster-relief 
and poverty-relief job. We must attach importance to reducing 
the peasants' burdens, lower production cost, and increase 
agriculture's economic efficiency, increase the peasant's income 
in various ways, and narrow the income gap between the urban and 
rural population. We must provide primary-level public health 
and health care in the rural areas and further develop urban and 
rural medical and sanitation and athletic undertakings and 
improve the people's health standard and their physical 
condition. We should pay attention to the construction of urban 
and rural public utilities and continue to improve housing 
conditions in the cities and towns. We must make improving the 
filthy, chaotic, and poor conditions the focal point and work on 
the greening, the beautification, and the cleaning up of the 
urban areas. We should make changing the water supply and the 
lavatory conditions the focal point in improving rural 
environment and sanitation condition, strengthen village and 
township construction plans, and improve the appearances of the 
villages. We should strengthen environ mental protection 
concepts; tackle environmental pollution problems; protect and 
properly utilize the land, mineral resources, forests, and water 
and other natural resources; and gradually improve the ecology 
and the environment. 
  We should continue to work diligently on family planning and 
make sure that we can reach the population control goals. We 
must insist on producing healthy babies and bringing them up in 
a good environment to improve the quality of the population. All 
businesses and industrie s and everybody must comply with the 
law and do a good job with family planning, take full 
responsibility, "veto by one vote," take other tough measures, 
and improve the minority nationalities' family planning work. We 
should study the question of population control under market 
economic conditions and strengthen the control of the mobile 
population. We should focus on Zhejiang's accelerated change in 
population-mix, actively study and resolve all the problems 
brought by the aging population, and include our gerontological 
undertakings in the social development program. 
<H5>  IV. Strengthen and Improve Party Leadership </H5>
  The key to speeding up reform and opening up and promoting 
socialist modernization and thoroughly and correctly 
implementing the party's basic line lies in proper party 
construction. In the new historical era, the party will find 
itself in a new environment and face very different tasks. In 
the wake of the development of the socialist market economic 
system and the expansion of our opening up to the outside world, 
the economic, political, cultural, and other aspects of society 
as well as the people's thinking and concepts, value, and 
behavior will necessarily change dramatically too. These not 
only will bring new life and vitality to party construction but 
will also pose new problems. We must take the initiative to 
adjust to the changing situation and tasks and accept the new 
tests. Guided by the theory of constructing a socialism with 
Chinese characteristics and the party's basic line, and heeding 
the 14th National Party Congress, we must insist that the party 
is in control of the party, and we must administer the party 
strictly, strengthen party construction, carry on the party's 
fine tradition, actively explore new ideas and new methods, 
strive to raise the party's governing and leadership standards, 
and turn the province's party organizations at all levels into 
strong leadership cores and fortresses to accelerate the reform 
and opening up and the socialist modernization construction. 
  One, we must strengthen ideological construction and 
firmly insist on arming the province's party members and cadres 
with the theory of building a socialism with Chinese 
characteristics. 
  Studying Marxism and Mao Zedong thought and arming the party 
with the theory of constructing a socialism with Chinese 
characteristics are the most basic of the party's ideological 
and theoretical construction tasks and the most fundamental work 
in strengthening and improving party construction, and they are 
also basic means to enhance our self-consciousness and 
steadfastness in implementing the party's basic line and to 
achieve a high degree of ideological and political unanimity. We 
must thoroughly and systematically study this theory and truly 
understand the nine theoretical viewpoints and principles summed 
up in the 14th National Party Congress's report, so that all 
party members, especially the party's leading cadres, can 
further reaffirm their conviction in socialism and communism and 
continuously improve their ideological and political quality and 
work standard. 
  The publication, Volume 3 Selected Works of Deng 
Xiaoping, was a major event in the party and the state's 
political life. Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping is 
the most important and most creative work in the course of 
Comrade Deng Xiaoping's formulation and development of the 
theory on constructing a socialism with Chinese characteristics. 
It is the theoretical summation of Comrade Deng Xiaoping's rich 
experience in leading the reform and opening up and the 
socialist modernization. It is the continuation and extension of 
Mao Zedong thoughts; it is contemporary Chinese Marxism; it is a 
scientific guide as we continue to push forward. Today, in 
studying the theory on constructing a socialism with Chinese 
characteristics, the focus should be on studying Selected 
Works of Deng Xiaoping. Party organizations at all levels 
must follow the Central Party Committee's and the provincial 
party committee's program and be diligent in their study and 
propaganda work. 
  We must tightly link our study with reality and seriously 
study the original work and grasp its spiritual essence. We must 
integrate studying Comrade Deng Xiaoping's strategic ideas and 
theoretical viewpoints with the study of his scientific 
attitude, creative spirit, and revolutionary style and link the 
study of Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping, to the 
total embodiment of the spirit of the 14th National Party 
Congress and the Third Plenary Session of the 14th Party Central 
Committee. We should further deepen our understanding of the 
ideological line of liberating our thinking and seeking truth 
from facts and the essence of socialism and the party's basic 
line, smash the backward traditional concepts and subjective 
prejudices, change the state of mind of sticking to old ways, 
increase the tempering of party spirit, increase the sense of 
principle, system, and farsightedness and creativity in our 
work, and strive to raise our Marxist theory standard. The 
socialist market economic theory is an important part of the 
construction of a socialism with Chinese characteristics. We 
must link the practices of reform and opening up to the 
successful experiences of foreign economic development, study 
hard, and quickly grasp the basic theories, basic laws, and 
basic knowledge of socialist market economy and increase our 
ability to study new situations, solve new problems, and create 
new patterns. 
  Leading cadres at all levels, especially leading cadres at 
above county department level, must take the lead in conducting 
industrious studies and meticulous research. They must be good 
at theoretical reasoning and applying what they have learned and 
set an example to give impetus to the masses of cadres and CPC 
members in their studies. We should continue to uphold the 
system of setting up party committee theory study central groups 
at different levels and the system of training leading cadre and 
link the leading cadres' on-the-job study and their 
away-from-production training. Party committee propaganda and 
organizational departments at all levels must strengthen their 
guidance, supervision, and examination in the studies. Party 
schools and cadre schools at all levels must make gathering the 
cadres to study Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory on constructing a 
socialism with Chinese characteristics the main topic of cadre 
training. Education in Marxist theory in the colleges should 
also be strengthened and improved ac cordingly. The masses of 
people engaged in propaganda and theory work must intensify 
their study of and give even more publicity to the theory of 
constructing a socialism with Chinese characteristics. 
  Two, strictly implement the system of democratic 
centralism and guarantee the party's unity and integrity. 
  Democratic centralism is the party's and the state's basic 
system. Only by strictly implementing democratic centralism and 
amplifying the party's internal political life can we pool the 
wisdom of the province's party organizations at all levels and 
of the masses of party members, reach a consensus on all major 
issues relevant to the people's basic interests, increase unity, 
and maintain unanimity in action, so that we can be sure that 
our decisions are correct and our implementation effective and 
the party's combat capability is enhanced. 
  When upholding democratic centralism, we must practice the 
kind of centralism that is based on democracy and the kind of 
democracy that is centrally guided. We must emphasize further 
amplifying democracy and actively dredge and expand democratic 
channels within the party. We must know how to listen to 
different ideas and diligently protect the democratic rights of 
organizations at all levels and all party members as stipulated 
by the party constitution. Important situations that affect the 
big picture must be reported to the party promptly, and the 
party's opinion must be solicited before making important 
decisions. This should be turned into a system. The party 
members and leading cadres must have good democratic workstyle. 
Party committees at all levels must uphold and amplify the 
system of collective leadership. All major issues must be 
thoroughly discussed, and decisions should be made collectively. 
Individuals must resolutely carry out the collective decisions 
and not do as they please. We must correctly handle the 
relationship between individuals and the organization. No 
individual is above the organization. We must strictly abide by 
the party's organizational principles and political discipline. 
Individuals must submit to the organization; minority must 
submit to the majority; subordinates must submit to their 
superior; the party must submit to the Party Central Committee. 
We must firmly oppose liberalism and rectify the absence of 
organization and discipline. We must consciously maintain a high 
degree of unanimity with the Party Central Committee in 
ideologies, on political matters, and in action to preserve the 
Party Central Committee's authoritativeness. In particular, as 
the interest pattern adjusts to the deepening reform, it is even 
more important that we take the whole situation into 
consideration and insist that the parts submit to the whole and 
make sure that government orders are not obstructed and orders 
and prohibitions are strictly obeyed. We should strive to create 
a centralized but democratic and disciplined but free political 
pattern which represents unified will but also expresses 
individual wishes and which is lively and energetic. 
  Party unity is the party's life. Leading cadres at all 
levels, especially the important leading cadres in the party and 
government, must set the example of unity, strictly abide by the 
party constitution and various regulations that set the norms 
for the party's political life, amplify the party's system of 
holding meetings on democratic life, actively engage in 
criticism and self-criticism, and increase unity by upholding 
party spirit principles. We must put the party's undertakings 
first and never get entangled in personal grievances. We must 
trust one another, support one another, understand one another, 
work together with one heart, and diligently increase the 
leading groups' solidarity and combat capabilities. We should 
enhance the unity between new and veteran party comrades. The 
young comrades must respect the veteran comrades and sincerely 
heed their suggestions. The old comrades must show concern for, 
understand, and love the young comrades and support their work 
warmheartedly. Under the leadership of the party committee, we 
must unite the party from within and without. 
  Three, strengthen the construction of the leading 
groups and increase our ability to master the whole 
situation. 
  Building leading groups at all levels is the basic guarantee 
of the thorough implementation of the party's basic line and is 
also the key link in strengthening and improving party 
construction. We must work hard to turn the leading groups at 
all levels into strong leading collectives that are true to 
Marxism, that insist on embarking on the road of socialism with 
Chinese characteristics, that have the courage to reform and are 
pragmatic in its creativity. They must be unified and 
harmonious, hard-working and honest, and must be able to 
maintain a close relationship with the masses. 
  Leading groups at all levels must firmly establish the idea 
of making economic construction the core and "grasping with both 
hands" to strengthen leadership in socialist modernization. We 
should follow the Party Central Committee's macro decisions, 
know how to make use of international and domestic situations as 
well as local conditions to determine the strategic goals and 
work ideas for economic and social development, formulate 
important general and specific policies for reform and opening 
up and for the construction of the two civilizations, and make 
important decisions and plans on major issues that impact the 
overall pattern of the era. We must amplify the democratic and 
scientific decision-making system and make investigation and 
study the basis of success and the road to new opportunities. We 
should know how to sum up our experience, improve leadership 
methods, broaden our knowledge, understand the whole situation, 
learn economics, attain professional proficiency, and raise the 
leading groups' overall standard in discussing major issues, 
managing the big picture, and making important decisions. We 
should give full play to the party committees as the leading 
core and strengthen and improve the leadership of the people's 
congress, the government, and the political consultative 
conference. We should put economic construction at the center, 
take the overall situation into consideration, coordinate all 
aspects, and mobilize all positive factors to form a cohesive 
force. 
  We must uphold the guiding principle of nurturing 
"revolutionary, young, intellectual, and professional" cadres 
and the principle of emphasizing both ability and moral when 
selecting and appointing cadres. Cadres who resolutely implement 
the party's basic line, who have a strong sense of revolutionary 
undertaking and a strong sense of responsibility in serving the 
people, who have outstanding accomplishments in reform and 
opening up and the modernization construction, and who are 
demanding of themselves and have earned the trust of the masses 
should be assigned to important posts. Cadres who are 
incompetent at their present jobs and who are irresponsible must 
be demoted. We should encourage the cadres to make bold attempts 
in reform and make new breakthroughs. We should sincerely help 
those who have flaws or have made mistakes at work. We should 
help them review their experiences and lessons to keep up the 
cadres' enthusiasm. We should uphold the principle that the 
party controls the cadres, and when choosing and appointing 
cadres, we must amplify democracy and uphold the mass line and 
do everything according to regulated procedure. We must smash 
the outmoded concepts of dwelling on seniority and rank and 
always demanding perfection; instead, we should broaden our 
outlook and widen the channels of hiring. We should hire people 
from all corners of the land based only on merits and must avoid 
and resist all unhealthy tendencies in employment. Those who 
have a serious problem with individualism and always demand good 
jobs must never be put in important positions. From the 
strategic high point of modernization, we should select many 
fine young and middle-aged cadres and continue to attach 
importance to building a contingent of reserve cadres and 
vigorously nurture successors to the socialist undertaking in 
the next century. We should attach great importance to nurturing 
and promoting woman cadres and minority nationality cadres and 
actively promote the reform of the cadre personnel system to 
meet the needs of the socialist market economy. We should bring 
in competition and incentive mechanisms and insist that cadres 
work at the top and the bottom, and we should implement the 
cadre exchange system. W e should diligently implement the cadre 
on-leave and retirement systems and show concern for them 
politically and in everyday life, so that they can still 
accomplish something and pass their old age in peace. We should 
take practical steps to show concern in every way we can for the 
veteran party members in the rural areas. 
  Four, strengthen grass-roots party organization 
construction and give full play to the CPC members' vanguard 
role. 
  The party's grass-roots organizations are at the frontline 
of 
reform and opening up and the socialist modernization. They are 
the basis of the party's work and combat strength. We should 
take the different characteristics of the villages, enterprises, 
schools, and organs into consideration to strengthen the 
grass-roots organizations' own construction and increase their 
combat strength as we reform and open up and develop the 
economy. In the rural areas, township (town) party committees 
and village party branches must make developing rural productive 
forces and leading the peasants toward the goal of becoming 
relatively well-off the focus of their work; they must tightly 
integrate them with the realities of rural economic construction 
and reform and opening up, do a better job with the 
village-level organizational setup that centers around the party 
branches, and bring their core leadership role into play as we 
go all out to promote rural economic and social development. 
Enterprise party organizations must revolve around accelerating 
the change in management mechanisms and gradually set up a 
modern enterprise system and tightly integrate it into the 
production and management activities, strengthen 
ideological-political work, and nurture a contingent of workers 
with the "four haves"--[ideal, moral, culture, and discipline], 
so that they can participate in enterprises' major decisions and 
guarantee and supervise the implementation of the party's and 
the state's general and specific policies toward enterprises and 
manifest their political core role. Party organizations in the 
schools must thoroughly implement the party's educational 
guiding principle and actively promote education reform and 
development. Their basic task should be to nurture builders and 
successors of socialist undertakings who are moralistic, 
intelligent, and physically-fit. Party organizations in 
government offices must help the administrative leaders complete 
their tasks and play a positive role especially in helping to 
change their functions and workstyle, in serving the 
grass-roots, stepping up supervision, and providing guarantees. 
  In the wake of reform and opening up and the development of 
the socialist market economy, economic entities of different 
economic makeup, organizational format, and management systems 
have greatly increased, and the production and management styles 
have changed dramatically. Construction of grass-roots party 
organizations must also adjust to the new situation and make 
appropriate changes in terms of organization installation, 
content of work, types of activities, leadership methods and so 
on. We must carry on and amplify our fine traditions but also 
actively explore new methods and sum up new experiences. We must 
diligently review the management-by-objective of party branch 
work implemented in recent years, launch such activities as 
"double strive, double evaluate" and "becoming fairly well-off 
villages," and meld grass-roots party construction, spiritual 
civilization, and economic construction into one whole 
experience. We should sum up the experience of giving play to 
the vanguard role of the masses of party members through the 
party member discussion meetings, obligation groups, 
responsibility districts, and contact households in the 
construction of the two civilizations. We should sum up the 
party construction experience of the township enterprises, the 
three kinds of foreign-funded enterprises, shareholding 
cooperative enterprises, and private enterprises and further 
promote grass-roots party construction work and continuously 
make improvements in practice. 
  We should build a stronger contingent of party members and 
continuously improve party member quality. We should educate the 
masses of party members on upholding party spirit principles and 
maintaining the party's progressive nature. We must correctly 
handle the relationship between implementing the party's 
existing policies and upholding the party's ideals and purpose 
and the relationship between reform and breakthroughs and 
strengthening party discipline. We must not let commodity 
exchange principles infiltrate the party's political life. We 
should turn the party members into progress elements who firmly 
implement the party's basic line, who have the courage to 
sacrifice themselves for the sake of reform and opening up and 
the modernization undertaking, who wholeheartedly work for the 
good of the people, who lead the masses in their arduous 
struggle, and who make selfless sacrifices and contribute to the 
economic development and social progress. We must abide by the 
party constitution, uphold the new era's party member standards, 
diligently recruit party members, and actively nurture and 
promptly recruit into the party fine elements who have political 
consciousness, who are young, educated, able, and have solid 
accomplishments; we must pay special attention to recruiting 
woman party members. In enterprises, we must attach importance 
to recruiting party members from among the firstline production 
workers and business mainstay and management personnel and 
gradually solve the current problem of the absence of party 
members in many production groups and organizations. In the 
rural areas, we should pay attention to localities where no 
party members have been recruited for a long time, where party 
members have become an aging group, and where village-level 
groups have no successors. We need fine young people who have 
good political ideology quality, who are economically-minded, 
and who are fairly well-educated. In colleges, we should attach 
importance to recruiting party members from among the fine 
young teachers, department heads, and active elements among the 
students. 
  Five, tighten the blood relations between the party and 
the people and persevere in our anti-corruption struggles 
  Party workstyle and honest government are issues that decide 
whether the people will support or rebel against us, whether 
reform and construction will succeed, and whether the party will 
survive or perish. We must fully recognize the urgency, 
permanence, and the arduous and complicated nature of our 
anti-corruption struggle. We must make protecting the state and 
the people's basic interests the starting point and firmly and 
steadfastly oppose corruption during reform and opening up. We 
must make a firm decision to eliminate graft and perversion of 
justice, giving and taking bribes, extortion and blackmail, 
buying power with money, squandering the people's wealth, 
corrosion and degeneration and other negative and corrupt 
phenomena, and we must diligently rectify all sorts of unhealthy 
tendencies. Anti-corruption struggles must revolve around 
economic construction and serve reform and development. We must 
focus on the long-term and plant our foothold on the present and 
do concrete and honest work to continuously set goals for each 
period. We are determined to get results and win the people's 
trust. 
  The key to good party workstyle and honesty in government 
lies in unifying the ideologies of leaders at all levels. We 
must fully understand the importance, necessity, and urgency of 
good party workstyle and honesty in government and the 
anti-corruption struggles and put the task on top of the agenda 
of party committees at every level and work diligently on it. 
First, we must begin with the leading organs and leading cadres 
at all levels. Each level should grab hold of another, and one 
level should give impetus to another. Party members and leading 
cadres at above county-level must strictly abide by the five 
requirements reiterated and set down by the Party Central Commi 
ttee, discipline themselves, take the lead in setting an 
example, and using themselves as role models; they must set high 
standards for their family and children and for people who work 
around them. We must firmly and promptly investigate and 
prosecute major and important cases, remove interferences, 
investigate thoroughly and punish the corrupt elements harshly; 
we must never be softhearted, because to tolerate evil is to 
abet it. We must always seek truth from facts and handle all 
cases according to t he law, ascertain the nature of the 
problems, and have a firm grasp on the policies. We must always 
be ready to tackle the unhealthy business tendencies that crop 
up at different times and the people's strong reactions to those 
practices and deal with them specifically in a timely fashion to 
ensure concrete results. 
  To punish and cure corruption, we must deal with the 
symptoms 
and the cause of the disease at the same time. Basically 
speaking, we must concentrate on education and the legal system. 
We must continuously educate the masses of party members and 
cadres on party ideologies, program, purpose, discipline, and 
the fine party workstyle. We must further improve the party 
members' and cadres' ideological and political quality, increase 
their ability to resist the corrosive ideologies of the 
exploitation class, and diligently review our practical 
experiences in the anti-corruption struggles. We must 
concentrate on the parts and links that are most susceptible to 
corruption, eliminate flaws, and plug loopholes. We must set up 
and amplify an internal management system and supervisory and 
restraining mechanisms, perfect the policies and laws and 
regulations, and rely on the system and the legal system to 
solve the corruption problem. We must enhance the leading 
groups' ability to discover and solve their own problems. We 
should strengthen the party organizations and disciplinary 
inspection organs' organized supervision of the party members 
and cadres, strengthen the masses and the democratic parties' 
and factions' and the non-party-affiliated personages' 
democratic supervision of our party, and strengthen the people's 
congresses and the judicial and procuratorial and auditing 
departments' legislative supervision with regard to honest 
government. We should give play to public opinion's supervisory 
role and set up a supervisory system inside and out, at the top 
and below. Party committees must strengthen leadership in the 
judicial and law enforcement departments, show support for their 
work, and gradually improve the work conditions in these 
departments. 
  Leading cadres at all levels must uphold the party's mass 
line and diligently improve their leadership style. We must 
strive to do what Comrade Jiang Zemin asked of us, to "squeeze 
more time into studying and spend less time on socializing; 
spend more time on investigation and studies and less on 
subjectivism; do more practical work and make less empty 
promises." We must overcome bureaucracy and formalism, go deep 
into the grass-roots level, observe the conditions of the 
people, show concern for their sufferings, listen to their 
cries, and try in earnest to solve the practical problems, so as 
to put the party's basic purpose, fine workstyle, and mass line 
into the practical work we do. We must rely wholeheartedly on 
the working class and the masses of workers and earnestly 
strengthen the party's leadership toward the labor unions, the 
China Youth League, the women's federations, and other mass 
organizations. We must support their right to do their work 
independently according to their own charters and give full play 
to their roles as bridges and links. We should support and 
strengthen the blood ties between the party and the masses 
through various ways and means. 
  Since its founding, the Provincial Advisory Committee has 
upheld the party's basic line, wrapped itself around economic 
construction, launched in-depth investigations and studies, 
participated in discussions before important decisions are made, 
done extensive propaganda work on the party's general and 
specific policies, and has amplified our revolutionary 
tradition. It has performed outstanding work in helping the 
provincial party committee to strengthen party construction, 
maintain party unity and social stability, and promote reform 
and modernization. Politically and ideologically, it has always 
maintain unanimity with the party and given play to its role as 
the provincial party committee's political advisor and 
assistant. On behalf of the provincial party committee, I want 
to express our wholehearted gratitude and our highest respect to 
comrades in the Provincial Advisory Committee. In accordance 
with the gist of the 14th National Party Congress, we will no 
longer set up party advisory committees in the future. The 
provincial party committee and party committees at all levels 
must continue to learn from the veteran comrades' firm political 
stand, their spirit of seeking truth from facts, their lofty 
revolutionary sentiments, their fine traditional workstyle, and 
their rich work experience, and we must, as always, continue to 
respect them politically and show concern for their lives and to 
give play to their role in the construction of the socialist two 
civilizations. 
  Dear comrades, we are facing the greatest opportunity of our 
lifetime. History has bestowed upon us a glorious yet arduous 
mission, and even though we will encounter many problems and 
conflicts on the road ahead of us, there is much we can 
accomplish; our future is full of hope. Under the leadership of 
the Party Central Committee, with Comrade Zhang Zemin at the 
core, let us insist on embarking on the road to a socialism with 
Chinese characteristics, uphold the party's basic line, and rely 
entirely on the province's 43 million people. We must liberate 
our thinking, seek truth from facts, share one heart and mind, 
rouse ourselves for the sake of the country's prosperity, 
struggle arduously, do practical work, make new contributions to 
the total realization of Zhejiang's magnificent reform and 
development goals in the 1990's, and win new victories for 
Zhejiang's socialist modernization construction! 

